output/hyph-id.level2.pat.txt
1unif
2unom
unti2
u2nub
u1o
u1p
1upac
1upah
1upam
u2p1an
1upay
upe2
upet1
2upi
u2pi.
upi2n
up1l
up2le
u2pr
u1q
u2ra
2ura.
ur1an
ur2as
2uray
2urea
uru2
2uru.
uruk1
u2r1ul
urup1
urus1
urut1
u2sa
1usai
2usal
us1an
1usap
1usea
2usen
use2r1
us2h
u1sho
usi2m
u1skr
usok2
usu2
usuk1
2usy
ut1an
2ute
u2t1em
ut1h
u2ti.
util2
u2tim
utip1
2uto
utus1
u1u
uu1h2
uu1n
u1v
u1w
uwa1n
2uwo
u1y
uyu2
uyub1
u1z
va1i
v1b
v1d
ve2i
ven2a
ve2ra
v1g
vi1h
2vl
v1la
v1li
2v1n
vol2a
2v1r
2v1s2
2v1t
1wa
2waai
wa2bi
wa2e
wa2i
waki2
wa1kr
wa2ma
wa2n
wapa1
was2r
wa1u
wes1a
we2t
wet1a
wi1h
1wi2n
win1i
wiri2
wit2
witi2
wo2i
wok2
won2a
wori2
2w1r
2w1t
wu1h2
wu2ka
wul2
wur1a
wu2ri
wu1s
wuyu1
2w1y
xil2
x1p
yada2
yait2
yaki2
yam2a
yami2
ya2pa
ya2pi
yas2
ya1uh
ya1uk1
ya1ul
ya1up
yau2r
y1b
2y1c
y1d
yega2
yer2e
yesa2
ye2u2
yeur1
y1f
2y1g
y1h
yika2
yina2
yira2
yiri2
yisi2
2y1j
y1k
2y1l
y2o
yo2ka
yo2m
yong1
yopa2
yopi2
yo2t1
y1r
2y1s
y1t
yuku2
yu2ma
yu2mi
yut1
yu2ti
1yuz
2y1w
2y1y
za2a
za1h
za2i
za1im
zali2
zam2a
2z1b
2z1d
1ze
2z1h
zio2
2z1k
z1l
2z1m
2z1n
2z1t
zu1h
2z1y
2z1z
ê1d
ê1n
ê1r
êra1
